Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2206
Corporate name.

The corporate name of a corporation organized under sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 shall contain the word professional corporation, or P.C. The use of the word company, corporation, incorporated, or any other word, abbreviation, affix or prefix indicating that it is a corporation in the corporate name of a corporation organized under sections 21-2201 to 21-2222, other than the words professional corporation, or the abbreviation P.C. is specifically prohibited.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 6, p. 557.